Utah statutes.
73-18-9.   Exemptions from registration.
Registration under this chapter is not required for any of the following:
(1)  a motorboat or sailboat that:
(a)  is already covered by a valid registration issued by its nonresident
owner's resident state; and
(b)  has not been within this state in excess of 60 days for the calendar
year;
(2)  a motorboat or sailboat from a country other than the United States
temporarily using the waters of this state;
(3)  a motorboat or sailboat whose owner is the United States, a state or
subdivision thereof;
(4)  a ship's lifeboat; or
(5)  a motorboat or sailboat belonging to a class of vessels which is exempted
from registration by the board after the board finds:
(a)  that the registration of motorboats or sailboats of this class will not
materially aid in their identification; and
(b)  that the United States Coast Guard has a numbering system applicable to
the class of motorboats or sailboats to which the motorboat or sailboat in
question belongs, and the motorboat or sailboat would also be exempt from
numbering if it were subject to federal law.
